Illinois, session 104th, HB1158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act 5is amended by changing Section 9.6a as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2605/9.6a)  (from Ch. 42, par. 328.6a)7    Sec. 9.6a. Bonds for sewage treatment, water quality, and 8facility improvements. The corporate authorities of a sanitary 9district, in order to provide funds required for the 10replacing, remodeling, completing, altering, constructing and 11enlarging of sewage treatment works, administrative buildings, 12water quality improvement projects, distributed renewable 13energy generation devices, or flood control facilities, and 14additions therefor, pumping stations, tunnels, conduits, 15intercepting sewers and outlet sewers, together with the 16equipment, including air pollution equipment, and 17appurtenances thereto, to acquire property, real, personal or 18mixed, necessary for said purposes, for costs and expenses for 19the acquisition of the sites and rights-of-way necessary 20thereto, and for engineering expenses for designing and 21supervising the construction of such works, may issue on or 22before December 31, 2034, in addition to all other obligations 23heretofore or herein authorized, bonds, notes, or other   HB1158 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06162 RTM 16196 b1evidences of indebtedness for such purposes in an aggregate 2amount at any one time outstanding not to exceed 3.35% of the 3equalized assessed valuation of all taxable property within 4the sanitary district, to be ascertained by the last 5assessment for State and local taxes previous to the issuance 6of any such obligations. Such obligations shall be issued 7without submitting the question of such issuance to the legal 8voters of such sanitary district for approval.9    The corporate authorities may sell such obligations at 10private or public sale and enter into any contract or 11agreement necessary, appropriate or incidental to the exercise 12of the powers granted by this Act, including, without 13limitation, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase 14of such obligations and the payment of costs and expenses 15incident thereto. The corporate authorities may pay such costs 16and expenses, in whole or in part, from the corporate fund.17    Such obligations shall be issued from time to time only in 18amounts as may be required for such purposes but the amount of 19such obligations issued during any one budget year shall not 20exceed $250,000,000 $150,000,000 plus the amount of any 21obligations authorized by this Act to be issued during the 3 22budget years next preceding the year of issuance but which 23were not issued, provided, however, that this limitation shall 24not be applicable (i) to the issuance of obligations to refund 25bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, (ii) to 26obligations issued to provide for the repayment of money   HB1158 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06162 RTM 16196 b1received from the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund for 2the construction or repair of wastewater treatment works, and 3(iii) to obligations issued as part of the American Recovery 4and Reinvestment Act of 2009, issued prior to January 1, 2011, 5that are commonly known as "Build America Bonds" as authorized 6by Section 54AA of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 7amended. Each ordinance authorizing the issuance of the 8obligations shall state the general purpose or purposes for 9which they are to be issued, and the corporate authorities may 10at any time thereafter pass supplemental appropriations 11ordinances appropriating the proceeds from the sale of such 12obligations for such purposes.13    Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 9.6 or 14this Section, and in addition to any other amount of bonds 15authorized to be issued under this Act, the corporate 16authorities are authorized to issue from time to time bonds of 17the district in a principal amount not to exceed $600,000,000 18for the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 19established under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code 20without submitting the question of issuing bonds to the voters 21of the District. Any bond issuances under this paragraph are 22intended to decrease the unfunded liability of the pension 23fund and shall not decrease the amount of the employer 24contributions required in any given year under Section 13-503 25of the Illinois Pension Code.26    The corporate authorities may issue bonds, notes or other   HB1158 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06162 RTM 16196 b1evidences of indebtedness in an amount necessary to provide 2funds to refund outstanding obligations issued pursuant to 3this Section, including interest accrued or to accrue thereon.4(Source: P.A. 102-707, eff. 4-22-22; 103-299, eff. 1-1-24.)